Utah statutes.
59-15-102.   Tax delinquency -- Penalty.

If any person fails to pay the amount of any tax at the time it is due, a penalty as provided under Section 59-1-401 shall be imposed, and the tax shall bear interest at the rate and in the manner prescribed in Section 59-1-402.



Amended by Chapter 1, 1993 Special Session 2

